Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1264
Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by a county attorney or the Attorney General and law enforcement officers under section 43-1262 or 43-1263.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 39.